en: Growth milks
ca: Llets de creixement
de: Kindermilch
fi: kasvumaidot
fr: Laits de croissance, lait de croissance, lait destiné aux enfants à partir de 10 mois à 3 ans
hr: Mlijeka za rast
it: Latte della crescita, Latte per la crescita
nl: Peutermelk
pt: Leites de crescimento

en: Ready to feed baby growing up milk
fr: Lait de croissance pour enfants en bas âge, Aliment lacté liquide destiné aux enfants en bas âge
pt: Pronto para alimentar o bebê crescendo com leite

en: Anti-reflux milk
ca: Llet contra els refluxs
fr: Lait anti-reflux
hr: Mlijeko protiv refluksa
it: Latte antirigurgito, Latte antireflusso
pt: Leite anti-refluxo
zh: 防反流奶粉

en: Hypoallergenic milks
ca: Llets hipoal·lergèniques
fr: Laits hypoallergéniques, Laits HA
hr: Hipoalergena mlijeka
it: Latte ipoallergenico
nl: Hypoallergene melk
pt: Leites hipoalergênicos

en: Milks for premature babies
ca: Llets per nadons prematurs
es: Leches para bebés prematuros
fr: Laits pour bébé prématurés
hr: Mlijeka za nedonoščad
it: Latte per neonati prematuri
nl: Melk voor premature baby's
pt: Leites para bebês prematuros

en: Evening meals for babies
de: Abendessen für Babys
fi: ilta-aterioita vauvoille
fr: Plats du soir pour bébé, Repas du soir pour bébé
hr: Večernji obroci za bebe
hu: Vacsora bébiételek
it: Pasti serali per neonati
nl: Baby-avondmaaltijden, Baby-avondmaaltijd
pt: Refeições noturnas para bebês
ro: Cină pentru bebeluși, Cină bebeluși

en: Main meals for babies, Baby main meals
de: Hauptgerichte für Babies
es: Comidas para bebés
fi: pääaterioita vauvoille
fr: Plats principaux pour bébé, Plats principaux bébé
hr: Glavni obroci za bebe
hu: Bébi főételek
it: Pasti principali per neonati
nl: Babymaaltijden, Babymaaltijd
pt: Refeições principais para bebês, refeições principais para bebês

en: Baby dishes
de: Babygerichte
fi: Vauvanateriat
fr: Assiettes pour bébé
hr: Posuđe za bebe
it: Piatti per neonati
nl: Babyschotels, Babyschotel
pt: Pratos de bebê

en: Vegetables menus for babies
de: Gemüsegerichte für Babies
fr: Menus Légumes pour bébé
hr: Jelovnici s povrćem za bebe
it: Pasti per neonati a base di verdure
nl: Babygroentemaaltijden, Babygroentemaaltijd
pt: Menus de vegetais para bebês

en: Fish menus for babies
de: Fischgerichte für Babies
fr: Menus Poissons pour bébé
hr: Riblji jelovnici za bebe
it: Pasti per neonati a base di pesce
nl: Babyvismaaltijden, Babyvismaaltijd
pt: Menus de peixe para bebês

en: Meat menus for babies
de: Fleischgerichte für Babies
fi: liharuokia vauvoille
fr: Menus Viandes pour bébé
hr: Mesni jelovnici za bebe
it: Pasti per neonati a base di carne
nl: Babyvleesmaaltijden, Babyvleesmaaltijd
pt: Menus de carne para bebês

fr: Petits pots pour bébé, petits pots bébé, petit pot bébé, petits pots pour bébés, petits pots, petit pot
de: Babynahrungsgläschen
es: Potitos para bebés, potitos bebé, potito bebé, potitos para bebés, potitos, potito
nl: Babypotjes, Babypotje

en: Baby food jar with vegetables from 4-6 months
fr: Petits pots aux légumes pour bébés dès 4-6 mois
pt: Pote de comida para bebê com vegetais de 4 a 6 meses

en: Baby food jar with vegetables and starch from 4-6 months
fr: Petit pots aux légumes avec féculents pour bébés dès 4/6 mois
pt: Pote de comida para bebê com vegetais e amido de 4 a 6 meses

en: Baby food jar with banana
fr: Petits pots aux fruits avec bananes pour bébé
pt: Pote de comida para bebê com banana

en: Baby food jar without banana
fr: Petits pots aux fruits sans banane pour bébé
hr: Posuda za dječju hranu bez banane
it: Vasetti di cibo per bambini senza banana
nl: Babypotje zonder banaan
pt: Pote de comida para bebê sem banana

en: Soups for babies, Soups for baby, Soup for babies, Soup for baby
de: Babysuppen
es: Sopas para bebés, Sopas para bebé, Sopa para bebés, Sopa para bebé
fi: Keitot vauvoille, Keitto vauvoille
fr: Potages pour bébé
hr: Juhe za bebe
it: Zuppe e minestre per neonati
nl: Babysoepen, Babysoep
pt: Sopas para bebês

en: Instant cereal powder to be reconstituted for baby from 4/6 months
fr: Céréales instantanées en poudre pour bébé dès 4/6 mois
pt: Cereal em pó instantâneo para reconstituir para bebé a partir dos 4/6 meses

en: Instant cereal powder to be reconstituted for baby from 6 months
de: Instantes Getreidepulver zur Zubereitung für Babys ab 6 Monaten
es: Cereal en polvo instantáneo para bebés a partir de 6 meses
fr: Céréales instantanées en poudre pour bébé dès 6 mois
hr: Instant žitarice u prahu za rekonstituciju za bebe od 6 mjeseci
it: Cereali in polvere istantanei da reidratare per bambini a partire dai 6 mesi
nl: Instante graanpoeder om te reconstitueren voor baby's vanaf 6 maanden
pt: Cereal em pó instantâneo para reconstituir para bebês a partir dos 6 meses

en: Soup for baby with vegetables and cereals and milk
de: Suppe für Baby mit Gemüse, Getreide und Milch
es: Sopa para bebé con verduras, cereales y leche
fr: Soupe pour bébé aux légumes aux céréales et au lait
hr: Juha za bebu s povrćem i žitaricama i mlijekom
it: Zuppa per bambini con verdure, cereali e latte
nl: Soep voor baby met groenten, granen en melk
pt: Sopa para bebê com legumes e cereais e leite